Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 464, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 464. Whenever any provision of law directs that a
report, administrative rule, budget work program, budget request, or
any other document be filed with the Governor, President Pro Tempore
of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, such
documents shall be filed electronically, except as otherwise
provided in this section. The Governor, President Pro Tempore of
the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each
create or cause to be created on the official websites for the
Governor, Senate and House of Representatives, respectively, a
mechanism for such filings to be made, with an electronic return
receipt provided to the person making the filing. If for any reason
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3047 Page 1

the person required to file such document determines that it cannot
be filed electronically, the person shall file a printed copy in
lieu of such electronic filing and shall include an explanation of
the reason that the document could not be filed electronically. Any
report that an agency is required by statute to provide to the
Legislature shall be electronically filed with the Legislative
Office of Fiscal Transparency, which is hereby directed to establish
an online filing system for the receipt of reports. The Legislative
Office of Fiscal Transparency shall maintain an index of all reports
that are statutorily required to be provided by agencies to the
Legislature, including the submittal status of each report. The
Legislative Office of Fiscal Transparency shall also notify the
Legislature of the availability of the reports in a centralized
location and shall maintain electronic copies of the reports.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 23rd day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3047 Page 2